Utah statutes.
53-3-1006.   Licenses -- Cancellation, revocation, or refusal to issue or renew -- Ineligibility for license.

(1)  The department may cancel, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew an ignition interlock system provider or installer license if it finds that the licensee or applicant has not complied with or has violated this part or any rule made by the division.

(2)  A licensee:

(a)  shall return a canceled or revoked license to the division; and

(b)  is not eligible to apply for a license under this part until six months have elapsed since the date of a cancellation or revocation under this section.



Enacted by Chapter 421, 2011 General Session

